Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 3. Small Business Assistance Program.

Sec. 46.14.300.
Small business assistance program.

A small business assistance program is established in the department. The department shall include the program in the state air quality control plan developed under 42 U.S.C. 7401 — 7671q (Clean Air Act).

The small business assistance program shall, by regulation, meet the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 7661f(a) (Clean Air Act, sec. 507(a)), including the requirement that a small business advocate be designated.

Except as provided in AS

46.14.310(b)

, the department shall provide assistance as described in (b) of this section to a requesting stationary source that is not a small business concern as defined in 15 U.S.C. 632 but that is subject to the requirements of this chapter if the legislature appropriates money from the general fund for this purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 38 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 66 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (c), substituted “15 U.S.C. 632” for “15 U.S.C. 631”.

Sec. 46.14.310.
Power to limit small business assistance program.

After consultation with the federal administrator and the administrator of the United States Small Business Administration and after providing notice and opportunity for public hearing, the department may exclude from the scope of the small business assistance program established in AS

46.14.300

a category or subcategory of small business facilities that the department finds to have sufficient technical and financial capabilities to meet the requirements of this chapter and federal law without the assistance provided under AS

46.14.300

—

46.14.320

.

Nothing in AS

46.14.300(c)

precludes the department from excluding a business facility or category of business facilities that the department finds to have sufficient technical and financial capabilities to meet the requirements of this chapter without assistance from the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.320.
Compliance advisory panel.

There is established in the department a compliance advisory panel whose members shall serve staggered three-year terms. A member may not serve more than two three-year terms consecutively.

The panel consists of

two members who are not owners or representatives of owners of small business facilities, selected by the governor to represent the general public;

one member selected by the commissioner to represent the department; and

four members who are owners or representatives of owners of small business facilities, selected as follows:

one shall be selected by the president of the senate and one shall be selected by the speaker of the house;

if there are members of the senate who are not part of the majority caucus of the senate, the leader of the largest nonmajority group shall select a panel member; if all members of the senate are in the majority caucus, then the president of the senate shall select a second panel member in addition to the selection authorized under (A) of this paragraph;

if there are members of the house who are not part of the majority caucus of the house, the leader of the largest nonmajority group shall select a panel member; if all members of the house are in the majority caucus, then the speaker of the house shall select a second panel member in addition to the selection authorized under (A) of this paragraph.

The panel members shall serve without compensation but are entitled to transportation expenses and per diem as authorized for members of boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

The compliance advisory panel shall

elect a chair and agree upon procedures by which the panel will function;

meet annually and at the call of the chair and give public notice of panel meetings as required under AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act);

prepare advisory opinions concerning the effectiveness of the small business assistance program, difficulties encountered in making the program efficient and effective, and degree of enforcement and severity of air pollution offenses;

make periodic reports to the administrator concerning the compliance of the small business assistance program with requirements of 44 U.S.C. 3501 (Paperwork Reduction Act), 5 U.S.C. 601 (Regulatory Flexibility Act), and 5 U.S.C. 504 (Equal Access to Justice Act);

review information designed to assist small business facilities in complying with this chapter to ensure that the information is understandable by the public; and

use the assistance of the small business advocate designated under AS

46.14.300(b)

in the development and dissemination of panel reports and advisory opinions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.